California, session 20252026, AB2522.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6369.3 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:6369.3. (a) For purposes of this section, “over-the-counter medication” means a nonprescription drug regulated by the Food and Drug Administration pursuant to the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) and federal regulations adopted pursuant to that act, including, but not limited to, Part 211 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (b) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, over-the-counter medication.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by subdivision (a) does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051 or 6201 that is deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15. (d) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares the specific goal, purpose, and objective that the exemption will achieve is to create tax parity between prescription and over-the-counter medications.(2) (A) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use when measuring whether the tax expenditure meets the goal, purpose, and objective shall be the number of transactions exempt from sales and use tax pursuant to this section, and the total dollar value of taxes forgone.(B) No later than January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, the Department shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of transactions exempt from sales and use tax pursuant to this section, and the total dollar value of taxes forgone.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.